Washington statutes.
RCW 10.37.190

Words and phrases—How used.

The words used in an indictment or information must be construed in their usual acceptation, in common language, except words and phrases defined by law, which are to be construed according to their legal meaning.

[ 1891 c 28 s 27; Code 1881 s 1012; 1873 p 227 s 195; 1869 p 241 s 190; RRS s 2063.]